Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.440

Earned disability allowance—Disposition upon death of recipient.

(1) A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599. The member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.35.400 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department. If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the allowance.

(2) If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her legal representative.

[ 1998 c 341 s 105.]